test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_23_pimmee_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Jok.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ei tsekattu: # Noun 'mørkt'
     pimmee+A+Sg+Nom: pimeä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Gen: pimeän
     pimmee+A+Sg+Par: [pimeätä, pimeää]
     pimmee+A+Sg+Tra: pimeäksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Abe: pimeättä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ine: pimeässä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ela: pimeästä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ill: pimehään
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ade: pimeällä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Abl: pimeältä
     pimmee+A+Sg+All: [pimeälle, pimeället]
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ess: pimeännä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Nom: pimeät
     pimmee+A+Pl+Gen: pimeitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Par: pimeitä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Tra: pimeiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Abe: pimeittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ine: pimeissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ela: pimeistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ill: pimeissiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ade: pimeilä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Abl: pimeiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+All: [pimeile, pimeilet]
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ess: pimeinä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Com: pimeine

     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Nom: pimeämpi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Gen: pimeämmän
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Par: pimeämpää
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Tra: pimeämmäksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Abe: pimeämmättä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Ine: pimeämmässä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Ela: pimeämmästä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Ill: pimeämphään
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Ade: pimeämmälä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Abl: pimeämmältä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+All: [pimeämmäle, pimeämmälet]
     pimmee+A+Sg+Compar+Ess: pimeämpänä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Nom: pimeämmät
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Gen: pimeämmitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Par: pimeämpiä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Tra: pimeämmiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Abe: pimeämmittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Ine: pimeämmissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Ela: pimeämmistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Ill: pimeämphiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Ade: pimeämmilä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Abl: pimeämmiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+All: [pimeämmile, pimeämmilet]
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Ess: pimeämpinä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Compar+Com: pimeämpine

     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: pimein
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: pimeimän
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Par: pimeintä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: pimeimäksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: pimeimättä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: pimeimässä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: pimeimästä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: pimeimphään
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: pimeimällä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: pimeimältä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+All: [pimeimälle, pimeimället]
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: pimeimpännä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: pimeimät
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: pimeimitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Par: pimeimpiä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: pimeimiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: pimeimittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: pimeimissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: pimeimistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: pimeimphiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: pimeimillä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: pimeimiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+All: [pimeimille, pimeimillet]
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: pimeimpinnä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Com: pimeimpinne
